Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1134
Trial by referee; exceptions; report.

It shall be the duty of the referees to sign any true exceptions taken to any order or decision by them made in the case and return the same with their report to the court making the reference.

R.S.1867, Code § 303, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 7872;

C.S.1922, § 8817;

C.S.1929, § 20-1134;

R.S.1943, § 25-1134.

Referee, and not judge, must settle bill of exceptions. Bennett v. Baum, 90 Neb. 320, 133 N.W. 439 (1911).

This section confers authority upon a referee to sign a bill of exceptions. State ex rel. Dunterman v. Gaslin, 30 Neb. 651, 46 N.W. 917 (1890).